Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-3001
Nebraska Financial Innovation Act, how cited.

Sections 8-3001 to 8-3031 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 1.